District of Columbia statutes.
21-2301

Custodial power of attorney.

(a)

The parent of a child may create a revocable custodial power of attorney that grants to another person any of the parent’s rights and responsibilities regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, including the ability to:

(1)

Enroll the child in school;

(2)

Obtain from the school educational and behavioral information about the child;

(3)

Consent to all school-related matters regarding the child; and

(4)

Consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child.

(b)

The custodial power of attorney may not grant authority to consent to the marriage or adoption of the child.

(c)

The custodial power of attorney shall not affect the rights of the parent of the child in any proceeding concerning custody of the child or the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child.

Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 4(b), 54 DCR 6835
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).